Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-235
Law enforcement officers; ticket quota requirements; prohibited.

A state agency or political subdivision shall not directly require a law enforcement officer employed by the state agency or political subdivision to issue a certain number or percentage of traffic citations, police citations, memoranda of traffic violations, memoranda of faulty equipment, or any other type of citation on any periodic basis. The purpose of this section is to prohibit all types of ticket quota requirements for law enforcement officers. For purposes of this section, law enforcement officer includes peace officers as defined in section 49-801 and conservation officers of the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 2000, LB 204, § 1.